Utah statutes.
31A-5-407.   Board of directors.
(1)  Subject to this section, Sections 16-10a-801 through 16-10a-803,
16-10a-805, and 16-10a-811 apply to the board of directors of a stock
corporation and Sections 16-6a-802 and 16-6a-805 apply to the governing board
and trustees of mutuals.
(2)  A majority of the directors shall be residents of this state unless the
commissioner is satisfied that the corporation's financial condition,
management, and other circumstances give assurance that the interests of
insureds and the public will not be endangered by the majority being
nonresidents.
(3)  Employees and agents of a corporation that receive more than 10% of their
income from the corporation, and persons related to any of them within the
second degree by blood or marriage, if directors, are considered "inside
directors."  Inside directors may not constitute a majority of the
corporation's board.
(4)  Subsections (2) and (3) and the required number of directors for
committees under Subsection 31A-5-412 (1) do not apply to an insurance
subsidiary authorized under Subsection 31A-5-218 (1), nor to a stock insurance
corporation, more than 50% of whose outstanding shares entitled to vote are
owned or controlled by a single person or all of whose voting shareholders are
either members of or are individually represented on the board.
(5)  If the directors of a corporation are divided into classes by the
articles or the bylaws, no class may contain fewer than one-third of the total
number of directors.  Subject to this requirement, Section 16-10a-804 applies
to the classification of directors of stock corporations.  When classes of
trustees or directors are provided in a mutual corporation, the terms of
office of the several classes need not be uniform.
(6)  The board shall manage the business and affairs of the corporation and
may not delegate its power or responsibility, except as authorized by Section
31A-5-412.
(7)  Section 16-10a-824 applies to the determination of a quorum of directors
of a stock corporation and Section 16-6a-816 applies to the determination of a
quorum of trustees for a mutual, except as specifically provided otherwise in
this title.
(8) (a)  Sections 16-10a-820 and 16-10a-821 apply to the meetings and action
without a meeting of the board of directors of stock corporations.
(b)  Sections 16-6a-812 through 16-6a-819 apply to the meetings and notice of
mutuals.
(9)  Sections 16-10a-1601 through 16-10a-1604 apply to stock corporations and
Section 16-6a-1602 applies to mutuals regarding the examination of books and
records of these entities.
